Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB133.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 335B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 7 of this Act:
(1) "Board" means a government agency, board, department, or other government
entity that regulates a lawful occupation and issues an occupational license or
government certification to an individual;
(2) "Government certification" means a voluntary, government-granted, and
nontransferable recognition to an individual who meets personal qualifications
related to a lawful occupation. Upon the government's initial and continuing
approval, the individual may use "government certified" or "state certified" as a
title. A noncertified individual may also perform the lawful occupation for
compensation, but may not use the title "government certified" or "state
certified." "Government certification" shall not be synonymous with
"occupational license," and shall not include credentials that are prerequisites to
working lawfully in an occupation;
(3) "Lawful occupation" means a course of conduct, pursuit, or profession that
includes the sale of goods or services that are not themselves illegal to sell
irrespective of whether the individual selling them is subject to an occupational
license;
(4) "Military" means the Armed Forces of the United States, including the Air
Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Navy, Space Force, National Guard,
and all reserve components and auxiliaries. "Military" also includes the military
reserves and militia of any United States territory or state;
(5) "Occupational license" means a nontransferable authorization in law for an
individual to perform exclusively a lawful occupation based on meeting personal
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/8/2025 9:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1118
qualifications, including military occupational specialties. In an occupation for
which an occupational license is required, it is illegal for an individual who does
not possess a valid occupational license to perform the occupation;
(6) "Other state" or "another state" means any territory or state of the United States,
other than this Commonwealth; and
(7) "Scope of practice" means the procedures, actions, processes, and work that a
person may perform under an occupational license or government certification
issued in this Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 335B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other law, a board in this Commonwealth shall issue an
occupational license or government certification to a person or military spouse
upon application if all the following apply:
(a) The person holds a current and valid occupational license or government
certification in another jurisdiction, including in another state, district, or
territory of the United States, or in a location outside of the United States, in
a lawful occupation with a similar scope of practice, as determined by the
applicable board in this Commonwealth;
(b) The person has held the occupational license or government certification in
the issuing jurisdiction for at least one (1) year and is in good standing;
(c) The board in the issuing jurisdiction required the person to pass an
examination, or to meet education, training, or experience standards;
(d) The person does not have a disqualifying criminal record as determined by
the applicable board in this Commonwealth;
(e) No board in another jurisdiction has revoked, nor has the person
surrendered in another jurisdiction, an occupational license or government
certification because of negligence or intentional misconduct related to the
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/8/2025 9:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1118
person's work in the occupation;
(f) The person does not have a complaint, allegation, or investigation pending
before a board in another jurisdiction which relates to unprofessional
conduct or an alleged crime. If the person has a complaint, allegation, or
investigation pending, the applicable board in this Commonwealth shall not
issue, and shall not deny, an occupational license or government
certification to the person until the:
1. Complaint, allegation, or investigation is resolved; or
2. Person otherwise meets the criteria for an occupational license or
government certification to the satisfaction of this Commonwealth's
board; and
(g) The person pays all applicable fees of the Commonwealth.
(2) If another jurisdiction issued the person or military spouse a government
certification but this Commonwealth requires an occupational license for the
same job, the applicable board in this Commonwealth shall issue an occupational
license to the person if the person otherwise satisfies all the requirements.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 335B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other law, a board in this Commonwealth shall issue an
occupational license or government certification to a person or military spouse
upon an application based on work experience in another jurisdiction, if all the
following apply:
(a) The person worked in a jurisdiction that does not use an occupational
license or government certification to regulate a lawful occupation, but this
Commonwealth uses an occupational license or government certification to
regulate a lawful occupation with a similar scope of practice, as determined
by the board;
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/8/2025 9:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1118
(b) The person worked for at least one (1) year in the lawful occupation; and
(c) The person satisfies the requirements of subsection (1)(d) to (g) of Section 2
of this Act.
(2) A board may require a person to pass a jurisprudential examination specific to
relevant state laws that regulate the occupation if an occupational license or
government certification in this Commonwealth requires a person to pass a
jurisprudential examination specific to relevant state statutes and administrative
regulations that regulate the occupation.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 335B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A board in this Commonwealth shall provide the person with a written decision
regarding the application within thirty (30) days after receiving a completed
application.
(2) The person may appeal the board's decision to a court of general jurisdiction.
(3) The person may appeal the board's:
(a) Denial of an occupational license or government certification;
(b) Determination of the occupation; and
(c) Determination of the similarity of the scope of practice of the occupational
license or government certification issued.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 335B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person who obtains an occupational license or government certification
pursuant to Sections 1 to 7 of this Act is subject to the:
(a) Laws regulating the occupation in this Commonwealth; and
(b) Jurisdiction of the applicable regulatory board in this Commonwealth.
(2) Sections 1 to 7 of this Act do not apply to an occupation regulated by the
Kentucky Supreme Court.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/8/2025 9:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1118
(3) Nothing in Sections 1 to 7 of this Act shall be construed to prohibit a person from
applying for an occupational license or government certification under another
statute or administrative regulation of this Commonwealth.
(4) An occupational license or government certification issued pursuant to Sections 1
to 7 of this Act is valid only in this Commonwealth and does not make the person
eligible to work in another jurisdiction under an interstate compact or reciprocity
agreement unless otherwise provided in law.
(5) Nothing in Sections 1 to 7 of this Act shall be construed to require a private
certification organization to grant or deny private certification to any individual.
(6) An applicable board may charge a fee to a person submitting an application
under Sections 1 to 7 of this Act to recoup its costs, not to exceed one hundred
dollars ($100).
(7) Sections 1 to 7 of this Act preempt laws of city, county, and other governments in
this Commonwealth which regulate occupational licenses and government
certifications.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 335B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) During a declared emergency, the Governor may order the recognition of an
occupational license from another jurisdiction as if the license is issued in this
Commonwealth.
(2) The Governor may expand any license's scope of practice and may authorize any
licensee to provide services in this Commonwealth in person, telephonically, or by
other means for the duration of the emergency.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 335B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 to 7 of this Act may be cited as the Universal Recognition of Occupational
Licenses Act.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/8/2025 9:58 AM Jacketed